Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.100

Experts or professional persons as witnesses.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

Subject to the rules of evidence, experts or professional persons who have reported pursuant to this chapter may be called as witnesses at any proceeding held pursuant to this chapter. Both the prosecution and the defendant may summon any other qualified expert or professional persons to testify.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 9; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 10.]